Illinois, session 104th, HB2561.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Freedom to Work Act is amended by 5changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 90/10)7    Sec. 10. Prohibiting covenants not to compete and 8covenants not to solicit.9    (a) No employer shall enter into a covenant not to compete 10with any employee unless the employee's actual or expected 11annualized rate of earnings exceeds $75,000 per year. This 12amount shall increase to $80,000 per year beginning on January 131, 2027, $85,000 per year beginning on January 1, 2032, and 14$90,000 per year beginning on January 1, 2037. A covenant not 15to compete entered into in violation of this subsection is 16void and unenforceable.17    (b) No employer shall enter into a covenant not to solicit 18with any employee unless the employee's actual or expected 19annualized rate of earnings exceeds $45,000 per year. This 20amount shall increase to $47,500 per year beginning on January 211, 2027, $50,000 per year beginning on January 1, 2032, and 22$52,500 per year beginning on January 1, 2037. A covenant not 23to solicit entered into in violation of this subsection is   HB2561- 2 -LRB104 09500 SPS 19562 b1void and unenforceable.2    (c) No employer shall enter into a covenant not to compete 3or a covenant not to solicit with any employee who an employer 4terminates or furloughs or lays off as the result of business 5circumstances or governmental orders related to the COVID-19 6pandemic or under circumstances that are similar to the 7COVID-19 pandemic, unless enforcement of the covenant not to 8compete includes compensation equivalent to the employee's 9base salary at the time of termination for the period of 10enforcement minus compensation earned through subsequent 11employment during the period of enforcement. A covenant not to 12compete or a covenant not to solicit entered into in violation 13of this subsection is void and unenforceable.14    (d) A covenant not to compete is void and illegal with 15respect to individuals covered by a collective bargaining 16agreement under the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act or the 17Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.18    (e) A covenant not to compete or a covenant not to solicit 19is void and illegal with respect to individuals employed in 20construction, regardless of whether an individual is covered 21by a collective bargaining agreement. This subsection (e) does 22not apply to construction employees who primarily perform 23management, engineering or architectural, design, or sales 24functions for the employer or who are shareholders, partners, 25or owners in any capacity of the employer. 26    (f) (e) Any covenant not to compete or covenant not to   HB2561- 3 -LRB104 09500 SPS 19562 b1solicit entered into after January 1, 2025 (the effective date 2of Public Act 103-915) this amendatory Act of the 103rd 3General Assembly shall not be enforceable with respect to the 4provision of mental health services to veterans and first 5responders by any licensed mental health professional in this 6State if the enforcement of the covenant not to compete or 7covenant not to solicit is likely to result in an increase in 8cost or difficulty for any veteran or first responder seeking 9mental health services.10    For the purpose of this subsection:11    "First responders" means emergency medical services 12personnel, as defined in the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 13Systems Act, firefighters, and law enforcement officers.14    "Licensed mental health professional" means a person 15licensed under the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, the 16Clinical Social Work and Social Work Practice Act, the 17Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act, the Nurse Practice 18Act, or the Professional Counselor and Clinical Professional 19Counselor Licensing and Practice Act.20    (g) Any covenant not to compete or covenant not to solicit 21entered into after the effective date of this amendatory Act 22of the 104th General Assembly shall not be enforceable with 23respect to the provision of reproductive health care or 24maternity care by a health care professional in this State if 25the enforcement of the covenant not to compete or covenant not 26to solicit is likely to reduce the availability of   HB2561- 4 -LRB104 09500 SPS 19562 b1reproductive health care or maternity care. In an action to 2enforce a covenant not to compete or covenant not to solicit 3entered into after the effective date of this amendatory Act 4of the 104th General Assembly, a party seeking to enforce the 5covenant not to compete or covenant not to solicit has the 6burden of proving that it will not reduce the availability of 7reproductive health care or maternity care in this State.8    For the purpose of this subsection, "health care 9professional", "maternity care", and "reproductive health 10care" have the meaning given to those terms in Section 1-10 of 11the Reproductive Health Act.12(Source: P.A. 102-358, eff. 1-1-22; 103-915, eff. 1-1-25; 13103-921, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.